Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.580

Contents of notice under RCW 31.12.575—Hearing—Order.

(1) A notice under RCW 31.12.575 must contain a statement of the facts that constitute grounds for removal or prohibition and must fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held. If the notice under RCW 31.12.575 is accompanied by a notice of suspension under RCW 31.12.372, the notice of suspension must reference the statement of facts in the notice under RCW 31.12.575 as the basis for its issuance.

(2) The hearing must be set not earlier than ten days after the date of service of the notice or later than thirty days after the date of service of the notice unless an earlier or later date is set by the director at the request of the credit union director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee for good cause shown or of the attorney general of the state.

(3) Unless the credit union director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee, after being served with the notice, appears at the hearing personally or by a duly authorized representative, the person is deemed to have consented to the issuance of an order of removal or prohibition or both. In the event of such consent or if upon the record made at the hearing the director finds that any of the grounds specified in the notice have been established, the director may issue such orders of removal from office or prohibition from participation in the conduct of the affairs of the credit union or any other depositary institution, trust company, bank holding company, thrift holding company, or financial holding company doing business in Washington state as the director may consider appropriate.

(4) An order becomes effective at the expiration of ten days after service upon the credit union and the credit union director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee concerned, except that an order issued upon consent becomes effective at the time specified in the order.

(5) An order remains effective except to the extent it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by the director or a reviewing court.

[ 2015 c 114 s 18.]